Georgia, session 2025_26, HB671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 51 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions as pertaining to torts, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
H. B. 671 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 62 0160S
"51-1-58.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Minor' means any person under the age of 18 years.
(2) 'Restricted sexual conduct' means:
(A) Sexually explicit conduct and sexually explicit descriptions of sexually explicit
conduct; or
(B) Sexually provocative dances or gestures performed with sexually explicit nudity
or sexual conduct as such terms are set forth in Code Section 16-12-102.
(3) 'Sexually explicit conduct' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 16-12-100.
(b) Any person who knowingly or negligently engages in sexually explicit conduct in the
presence of a minor shall be liable for the injury or damages caused by or resulting from
such engagement.
(c) Any person who knowingly or negligently allows, permits, encourages, or requires a
minor to be present while another engages in sexually explicit conduct in the presence of
such minor shall be liable for the injury or damages caused by or resulting from such
allowance, permission, encouragement, or requirement.
(d) Any person who knowingly or negligently engages in restricted sexual conduct in the
presence of a minor shall be liable for the injury or damages caused by or resulting from
such engagement.
(e) Any person who knowingly or negligently allows, permits, encourages, or requires a
minor to be present while another engages in restricted sexual conduct in the presence of
such minor shall be liable for the injury or damages caused by or resulting from such
allowance, permission, encouragement, or requirement.
(f)(1) The Department of Public Health may fine or suspend or revoke the license of any
hotel, as defined in Code Section 3-9-10, or food service establishment if the hotel or
food service establishment admits a minor to be present while another engages in
H. B. 671 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 62 0160S
sexually explicit conduct or restricted sexual conduct in violation of this Code section,
which violation constitutes an immediate, serious threat to the public health, safety, and
welfare. The Department of Public Health may issue a $50,000.00 fine for a first
violation of this Code section and a $100,000.00 fine for a second or subsequent violation
of this Code section.
(2) The Department of Revenue is given full power and authority to suspend or revoke
the license of any establishment holding a license for the sale of alcohol when it is
determined that such establishment admitted a minor to be present while another engaged
in sexually explicit conduct or restricted sexual conduct in violation of this Code section.
(g) It shall be a complete defense to any action brought pursuant to subsection (d) or (e)
of this Code section that:
(1) The person accused had reasonable cause to believe the minor involved was 18 years
of age or older; or
(2) Such minor presented a driver's license, state issued identification card, birth
certificate, passport, selective service card, or other official document to the accused
purporting to establish that such minor was 18 years of age or older.
(h) It shall not be a defense to any action brought pursuant to this Code section that the
minor on whose behalf such action is brought was accompanied by his or her parent or
legal guardian.
(i) An individual who is the prevailing party in his or her action brought pursuant to this
Code section shall be entitled to an award of court costs, costs of litigation, and reasonable
attorney's fees.
(j) Any action brought pursuant to this Code section shall be brought within four years
after the cause of action has accrued."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall apply to causes of action accruing on or after July 1, 2025.
H. B. 671 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 62 0160S
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 671 (SUB)
- 4 -